Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202647-1109
Assessment of achievements and effectiveness.

The department shall establish an internal system for assessing the achievements of community work release and reentry centers and the effectiveness of the Community Work Release and Reentry Centers Act as a whole. The department shall develop and maintain measurable goals and objectives for such assessment.

Laws 2024, LB631, § 9;

Laws 2025, LB150, § 66.